src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON xnas_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:%>^Vt PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^HMETA%>h^Vitten PxK ; !maitosalmhoitten !TEST
 +Pl+Gen:^HMET2%>h^Vitten PxK ; !maitosalhmoitten
 +Pl+Par:^HMETA%>h^Vit^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:^HMET2%>h^Vit^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^Vi n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:^HMETA%>h^Viss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:^HMET2%>h^Viss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:^HMETA%>h^Vist^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:^HMET2%>h^Vist^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:^HMETA%>h^Vile PxxK ;
 +Pl+All:^HMET2%>h^Vile PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^HMETA%>h^Vil^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^HMET2%>h^Vil^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^HMETA%>h^Vilt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^HMET2%>h^Vilt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:^HMETA%>h^Vin^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:^HMET2%>h^Vin^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:^HMETA%>h^Vi TRA ;
 +Pl+Tra:^HMET2%>h^Vi TRA ;
 +Pl+Abe:^HMETA%>h^Vitt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:^HMET2%>h^Vitt^A PxK ;


LEXICON 3mies
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Sg+Nom:s       PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:he%>n PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:s%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:hhe%>e n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:he%>ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:he%>st^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:he%>le PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:he%>l^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:he%>lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:he%>tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:he%>n^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:he TRA ;

 +N+Pl+Nom:he%>t PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:h%>ien PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:h%>i^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:hhii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:he%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:he%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:he%>i2le PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:he%>i2l^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:he%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:he%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:he%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra:he TRA ;

LEXICON n_ien
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 n_ien_sg ;
 n_ien_pl ;

LEXICON n_ien_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Sg+Nom:^WGn       PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:ne%>n PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:^WGn%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:n^HMETA%>heen PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:hneen PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:ne%>ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:ne%>st^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:ne%>lle PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:ne%>ll^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:ne%>lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:ne%>tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:ne%>nn^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:he TRA ;

LEXICON n_ien_pl !FIX!!
 +N+Pl+Nom:ne%>t PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:n^HMETA%>heet PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:h%>neet PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:n%>ien PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:n%>i^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:n^HMETA%>hiin PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:hniin PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:n%>hei2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:h%>nei2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:n%>hei2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:h%>nei2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:n%>hei2le PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:h%>nei2le PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:n%>hei2l^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:h%>nei2l^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:n%>hei2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:h%>nei2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:n%>hei2tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:h%>nei2tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:n%>hei2nn^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:h%>nei2nn^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra:hei2 TRA ;


LEXICON n_uus  !vajavuus
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Sg+Nom:s     R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:s     PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:t%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:t^HMETA%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>ess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:%>est^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:%>ele PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:%>el^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:%>elt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:t%>en^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra: TRA ;

 +N+Pl+Nom:%>et PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:ks%>i2en PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:ks%>i2^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:ks%>hii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:ks%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:ks%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:ks%>i2le PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:ks%>i2l^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:ks%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:ks%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra:ks TRA ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:ks%>i2n^A PxK ;

LEXICON n_uus_odd ! for odd syllabel-stems: suuruue->(suuruuelle pga lång vokal men) suuruuksille 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Sg+Nom:s     R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:s     PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:t%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:t^HMETA%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>ess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:%>est^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:%>elle PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:%>ell^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:%>elt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:t%>en^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra: TRA ;

 +N+Pl+Nom:%>et PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:ks%>i2en PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:ks%>i2^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:ks%>hii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:ks%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:ks%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:ks%>i2lle PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:ks%>i2ll^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:ks%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:ks%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra: TRA ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:ks%>i2n^A PxK ;

 
!! ### 2-syllabic LNR final stems

LEXICON 3n_lnr 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** ahven - ahvenheen
+N+Sg+Gen:e%>n R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:e%>n PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>ess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:%>en^A PxK ;
 3n_lnr_inteill ; 

LEXICON 30n_lnr
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** askel - askelheesheen
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:^HMET2%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n PxK ; !två genetivformer? askelen, askelheen
 !+N+Sg+Gen:^HMETA%>hee n_PxK ; askehleen? 
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>heeshee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>heeshee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>heess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:^HMET2%>heess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:%>heen^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:^HMET2%>heen^A PxK ;
 3n_lnr_inteill ; 

LEXICON TYÄR
+N+Sg+Nom:tyär K ; 
+N+Sg+Par:tytärtä K ;
+N+Sg+Par:tyärtä K ;
         :tyttär 3xn_lnr ;

LEXICON n_kasuven !!FIXA 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Sg+Nom:ven PxK ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>hviin PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ela:ven%>st^A PxK ;

+N+Pl+Ill:ve^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:ve^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+All:v%>i2lle PxK ;

LEXICON 3xn_lnr
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** tyär, kort och lång Ill
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:%>heeshee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:^HMET2%>heeshee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>ess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:%>en^A PxK ;
 3n_lnr_inteill ; 

LEXICON 3n_lnr_inteill 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** inte Ill, Ine, Ess men alla andra
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG  R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:^WG     PxK ;
 !+N+Sg+Gen:e%>n R ;
 !+N+Sg+Gen:e%>n PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:^WG%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:%>est^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:%>elle PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:%>ell^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:%>elt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:e TRA ;

 +N+Pl+Nom:e%>t PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>ten PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:e%>it^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>hii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:%>iss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:%>ist^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:%>ille PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:%>ill^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:%>ilt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>itt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra:%>i TRA ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:%>in^A PxK ;



LEXICON 4n_ks
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N: x4n_ks ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:s R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:kse%>n R ;

LEXICON x4n_ks
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 x4n_ks_sg ;
 x4n_ks_pl ;

LEXICON x4n_ks_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom:s       PxK ;
 +Sg+Gen:kse%>n PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:s%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:kse^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:kse%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:kse%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:kse%>le PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:kse%>l^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:kse%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:kse%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:kse%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:kse TRA ;


LEXICON x4n_ks_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:kse%>t PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:s%>ten PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:kse%>i2^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:kse%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:ks%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:kse%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:kse%>i2le PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:kse%>i2l^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:kse%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:kse%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:kse%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:ksi TRA ;





!! ### Sublexica for cases

LEXICON TRA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Err/Orth:%>ks K ; ! VetEj
 :%>ks i_PxK ;

!! ### Sublexica for possessive suffixes
! ---------------------------------

!! Px is now not in use, with one exception, comitative.

LEXICON n_PxK  !!≈ @CODE@ has either -n or goes to Px
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  :n K  ;
     Px ;

LEXICON i_PxK  !!≈ @CODE@ Tra: -i or -e and goes to Px
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  :i K  ;
  :e Px ;

LEXICON PxK !!≈ @CODE@ has only -nsA, and is currently not in use. Check
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  K  ;
  Px ;

LEXICON PxxK  !!≈ @CODE@ has also -Vn, thus both .. llensa and ..lleen.
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  KK    ; ! All, so KK not K
  Px    ;
  Px-Vn ;

!LEXICON Pxx ! nsA and Vn
!  Px    ;
!  Px-Vn ;

LEXICON Px
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +PxSg1:%>ni    K ;
 +PxSg2:%>sti   K ;
 +PxSg3:%>ns%^A K ;
 +PxPl1:%>mm^A  K ; ! NB! -m^A ei hoidettu
 +PxPl2:%>nn^A  K ; ! NB! -n^A ei hoidettu
 +PxPl3:%>ns%^A K ;


LEXICON Px-Vn
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +PxSg3:%>%^Vn K ;
 +PxPl3:%>%^Vn K ;
