src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
lihamies:liha#mie 3mies ;
marjamies:marja#mie 3mies ;
kolkkamies:kolkka#mie 3mies ;
jokamies:joka#mie 3mies ;
telamies:tela#mie 3mies ;
laijistamamies:laijistama#mie 3mies ;
marsimamies:marsima#mie 3mies ;
kuormamies:kuorma#mie 3mies ;
liippamies:liippa#mie 3mies ;
sotamies:sota#mie 3mies ;
lautamies:lauta#mie 3mies ;
puhemies:puhe#mie 3mies ;
kaijimies:kaiji#mie 3mies ;
koskimies:koski#mie 3mies ;
kompassimies:kompassi#mie 3mies ;
irtimies:irti#mie 3mies ;
paimenmies:paimen#mie 3mies ;
leikkomies:leikko#mie 3mies ;
pesomies:peso#mie 3mies ;
joutomies:jouto#mie 3mies ;
laitistusmies:laitistus#mie 3mies ;
kokumies:koku#mie 3mies ;
nykymies:nyky#mie 3mies ;
malminettimämies:malminettimä#mie 3mies ;
mettämies:mettä#mie 3mies ;
ien:ike n_ien ;
ikenheet:ike n_ien_pl ;
pahhuus:pahhuu n_uus_odd ;
laihuus:laihuu n_uus_odd ;
vanhuus:vanhuu n_uus_odd ;
vanhuus:vanhuu n_uus_odd ;
turhuus:turhuu n_uus_odd ;
lauhuus:lauhuu n_uus_odd ;
laajuus:laajuu n_uus_odd ;
luijuus:luijuu n_uus_odd ;
orjuus:orjuu n_uus_odd ;
kurjuus:kurjuu n_uus_odd ;
piikuus:piikuu n_uus_odd ;
tarkkuus:tarkkuu n_uus_odd ;
laiskuus:laiskuu n_uus_odd ;
korskuus:korskuu n_uus_odd ;
sammal:sammal 30n_lnr ;
suesammal:sue#sammal 30n_lnr ;
koskisammal:koski#sammal 30n_lnr ;
pounusammal:pounu#sammal 30n_lnr ;
taival:taipal 30n_lnr ;
koskitaival:koski#taipal 30n_lnr ;
mataluus:mataluu n_uus ;
askel:askel 30n_lnr ;
petkel:petkel 30n_lnr ;
kyynel:kyynel 30n_lnr ;
vemmel:vempel 30n_lnr ;
pistel:pistel 30n_lnr ;
jumalattomuus:jumalattomuu n_uus ;
toimettomuus:toimettomuu n_uus ;
mahottomuus:mahottomuu n_uus ;
höyhen:höyhen 3n_lnr ;
liemen:liemen 3n_lnr ;
siemen:siemen 3n_lnr ;
kaurasiemen:kaura#siemen 3n_lnr ;
ohransiemen:ohran#siemen 3n_lnr ;
paimen:paimen 3n_lnr ;
lamphaanpaimen:lamphaan#paimen 3n_lnr ;
lammaspaimen:lammas#paimen 3n_lnr ;
taimen:taimen 3n_lnr ;
kymmen:kymmen 3n_lnr ;
koskuskymmen:koskuskymmen 3n_lnr ;
karhunkämmen:karhun#kämmen 3n_lnr ;
joutsen:joutsen 3n_lnr ;
nilkkajäsen:nilkka#jäsen 3n_lnr ;
ahmajäsen:ahma#jäsen 3n_lnr ;
jorvajäsen:jorva#jäsen 3n_lnr ;
kyynäspäänjäsen:kyynäspään#jäsen 3n_lnr ;
ahven:ahven 3n_lnr ;
norjanahven:norjan#ahven 3n_lnr ;
riven:riven 3n_lnr ;
konnuus:konnuu n_uus ;
laipion:laipion 3n_lnr ;
nurinniskon:nurinniskon 3n_lnr ;
sisar:sisar 3n_lnr ;
kristisisar:kristi#sisar 3n_lnr ;
putinsaivar:putinsaivar 3n_lnr ;
penger:penker 30n_lnr ;
manner:manter 30n_lnr ; ! xxx check
tanner:tanter 30n_lnr ;
jääntanner:jään#tanter 30n_lnr ;
koiruus:koiruu n_uus_odd ;
nuoruus:nuoruu n_uus_odd ;
suuruus:suuruu n_uus_odd ;
tyär: TYÄR ;
vanhaatyär:vanhaa# TYÄR ;
jalkatyär:jalka# TYÄR ;
ottotyär:otto# TYÄR ;
tilasuus:tilasuu n_uus ;
luononomasuus:luononomasuu n_uus ;
hiljasuus:hiljasuu n_uus ;
lahkolaisuus:lahkolaisuu n_uus ;
kokonaisuus:kokonaisuu n_uus ;
jumalisuus:jumalisuu n_uus ;
lapselisuus:lapselisuu n_uus ;
teollisuus:teollisuu n_uus ;
vaitiolovelvolisuus:vaitiolo#velvolisuu n_uus ; !!≈ * @CODE@
lapsuus:lapsuu n_uus ;
maaossuus:maaossuu n_uus ;
kasuven:kasu n_kasuven ;
pummitiuhtuus:pummitiuhtuu n_uus ;
tottuus:tottuu n_uus ;
loksahus:loksahu 4n_ks ;
viivalus:viivalu 4n_ks ;
jumalanpalvelus:jumalanpalvelu 4n_ks ;
tutkimus:tutkimu 4n_ks ;
juromus:juromu 4n_ks ;
kostanus:kostanu 4n_ks ;
masenus:masenu 4n_ks ;
lommerus:lommeru 4n_ks ;
kosatus:kosatu 4n_ks ;
kuljetus:kuljetu 4n_ks ;
maijojuoksetus:maijojuoksetu 4n_ks ;
kallitus:kallitu 4n_ks ;
kaaritus:kaaritu 4n_ks ;
kaotus:kaotu 4n_ks ;
rajotus:rajotu 4n_ks ;
sekotus:sekotu 4n_ks ;
terotus:terotu 4n_ks ;
kangastus:kangastu 4n_ks ;
lunastus:lunastu 4n_ks ;
karvastus:karvastu 4n_ks ;
totistus:totistu 4n_ks ;
vaikutus:vaikutu 4n_ks ;
vanutus:vanutu 4n_ks ;
liinavuus:liinavuu n_uus ;
vahvuus:vahvuu n_uus ;
kovvuus:kovvuu n_uus ;
lähetys:lähety 4n_ks ;
jännitys:jännity 4n_ks ;
järjestys:järjesty 4n_ks ;
lyhhyys:lyhhyy n_uus_odd ;
tekopyhhyys:teko#pyhhyy n_uus_odd ;
köyhyys:köyhyy n_uus_odd ;
väljyys:väljyy n_uus_odd ;
tyllyys:tyllyy n_uus_odd ;
terfheettömyys:terfheettömyy n_uus ;
leivättömyys:leivättömyy n_uus ;
pienyys:pienyy n_uus_odd ;
likkeisyys:likkeisyy n_uus ;
neitsyys:neitsyy n_uus_odd ;
leväperäsyys:leväperäsyy n_uus ;
levvyys:levvyy n_uus_odd ;
